Utah statutes.
52-3-4.   Exceptions in towns and rural areas.
(1)  In a town, as defined in Section 10-1-104, this chapter shall not apply
to the employment of uncles, aunts, nephews, nieces, or cousins.
(2)  This chapter shall not apply to the employment of a relative if:
(a)  fewer than 3,000 people live within 40 miles of the primary place of
employment, measured over all weather public roads;
(b)  the job opening has had reasonable public notice; and
(c)  the relative is the best qualified candidate for the position.
(3)  In any proceeding challenging the hiring of a relative under the
exception in Subsection (2), the employer has the burden of establishing each
of the criteria provided in Subsections (2)(a) through (c).
